Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 3

Board of Pharmacy

63-10-301. Creation — Composition — Duties and powers — List of opioid drugs incorporating tamper or abuse resistant properties.

There shall exist and be maintained within this state a board of pharmacy. The board shall consist of seven (7) members, one (1) of whom shall be a consumer, who shall enforce parts 2-5 of this chapter and all laws that pertain to the practice of pharmacy and shall cooperate with other state and federal governmental agencies regarding any violations of any pharmacy drug or drug-related laws. The board has all of the duties, powers, responsibilities and authority specifically granted or necessary to the enforcement of parts 2-5 of this chapter, as well as other duties, powers, responsibilities and authority that may be granted by law.

The members of the board shall be entitled to a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day's service in attending meetings of the board and other administrative functions of the board, as well as the necessary expenses for traveling and subsistence while attending the meetings and performing the other administrative functions. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The board of pharmacy shall publish a list of opioid drugs incorporating tamper or abuse resistance properties. Inclusion of a drug on such list shall not require that a drug bear a labeling claim with respect to reduction of tampering, abuse or abuse potential at the time of listing. The inclusion of a drug on the list shall not prohibit a pharmacist from substituting an opioid drug, brand or generic, that is otherwise eligible for interchange or substitution under title 53, chapter 10, part 2. The inclusion of a drug on the list shall require that the drug has been submitted to the United States food and drug administration with a study related to tamper or abuse resistance properties. Following the publication of the initial list by the board of pharmacy, if the United States food and drug administration approves an opioid drug that bears in its label a claim to the drug's tamper or abuse resistance properties, such drug shall be added to the board of pharmacy list. This list shall be made available to prescribers, pharmacists, the commissioner of health, the commissioner of mental health and substances abuse services and the commissioner of safety.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 8; T.C.A. § 63-10-501; Acts 2007, ch. 407, §§ 2, 8; 2012, ch. 575, § 2; 2012, ch. 932, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of regulatory boards in the department of commerce and insurance for purposes of administration. See §§ 4-3-1304, 56-1-301 — 56-1-306.

The board of pharmacy, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2023. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-244.

Acts 2016, ch. 773, § 3, provided that representatives of the board of pharmacy shall appear before the government operations joint evaluation committee on education, health and general welfare no later than November 18, 2016, to update the joint evaluation committee on the board's progress in addressing the findings set forth in the October 2015 performance audit report issued by the division of state audit.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-302. Appointment — Qualifications — Term of appointment — Removal.

The governor shall appoint the members of the board and shall make appointments so that the pharmacist members of the board shall be graduates of a recognized school or college of pharmacy. In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

No pharmacist shall be eligible for appointment to the board unless such person has been a pharmacist under this or some other law of this state for a period of at least five (5) years and, during the terms of such person's incumbency, shall be actively engaged in the practice of pharmacy.

No consumer shall be eligible for appointment to the board to represent the public at large unless such person has been a resident of Tennessee for at least five (5) years, currently resides in Tennessee and is a nonhealth care professional by education. The consumer member shall not own or have any financial or other interest in any health care facility or business.

The terms of appointment shall be for six (6) years, or until their successors have qualified, and no member of the board is eligible for reappointment.

Interested pharmacist groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Pharmacists Association, may annually recommend five (5) duly qualified persons for each vacancy from whom the governor may be requested to make appointments. The governor shall consult with such groups to determine qualified persons to fill the positions. The appointment provisions of this subsection (e) shall not apply to the consumer member serving on the board. Appointees shall, within ten (10) days after appointment, make oath or affirmation to be filed with the secretary of state that they will faithfully and impartially perform their duties.

Members guilty of misconduct may be removed by the governor upon the recommendation of the remaining members. Vacancies occurring other than by expiration of terms may be filled as to unexpired terms by the governor from the most recent list of nominees of the interested pharmacist groups as provided in subsection (e).

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 9; T.C.A. § 63-10-502; Acts 2012, ch. 720, § 3.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-303. Officers — Quorum — Panels — Executive director.

The board shall have a president and a vice president, who shall be elected annually from its pharmacist members.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum. The board president may, when it is deemed necessary, split the board into panels of three (3) or more each to conduct contested case hearings or disciplinary matters. When the board is split into panels for purposes of contested case hearings and disciplinary matters, three (3) or more members shall constitute a quorum.

The division shall employ on behalf of and in consideration of the recommendation of the board an executive director who shall be a pharmacist who has been licensed in Tennessee for a period of at least five (5) years. The executive director's duties shall be those specified by the board and by the director and may include, but not be limited to, recording and compiling the minutes of the board, supervising the employees assigned by the division to support the board, performing such studies and research as the board or division directs, representing the board at such functions as authorized by the board and the division and acting as consultant to the division in its enforcement duties on behalf of the board.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 10; T.C.A. § 63-10-503; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 9.

Cross-References.

Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

Attorney General Opinions. Hiring of executive director of the board of pharmacy. OAG 11-47, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 49 (5/19/11).

63-10-304. Enforcement of pharmaceutical laws — Rules and regulations.

It is the duty of the board to enforce all the laws of the state now or hereafter enacted that pertain to the practice of pharmacy, the manufacture, distribution or sale of drugs, and the medication use process, including, but not limited to compounding, selection, preparation/production, dispensing/distribution, patient administration, education and monitoring of drugs, devices, chemicals or poisons. The division shall employ for the board the necessary administrative and clerical staff and investigators who are pharmacists to carry out the board's duty to enforce the pharmaceutical laws. The pharmacist investigators shall be authorized to conduct inspections of pharmacies and any other site where drugs, medicines, chemicals, pharmaceuticals or poisons are manufactured, stored, sold, dispensed, distributed or administered and shall conduct investigations of any licensee of the board. The pharmacist investigators may also assist in inspections and investigations undertaken by other health related boards attached to the division, and investigators assigned to these other health related boards may assist pharmacist investigators as appropriate.

The board shall adopt, amend and repeal rules for the proper administration and enforcement of parts 2-5 of this chapter, consistent with such provisions. The rules shall be adopted, amended or repealed in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The board shall adopt rules establishing minimum standards and conditions for operation of a pharmacy.

If the board determines it necessary in order to protect the health and welfare of the citizens of this state, it may adopt rules concerning the practice of pharmacy in this state also applicable to the practice of pharmacy located in another state.

The board also has the power and authority to adopt, amend and repeal rules of professional conduct appropriate to the establishment and maintenance of a high standard of integrity and dignity in the profession of pharmacy.

The board shall meet at least annually and at such other times as it deems necessary to perform its duties under this chapter.

The board shall keep a record of all its proceedings. The board shall issue and maintain a register of all persons to whom licenses have been issued and all renewals and a register of pharmacists having been designated as a pharmacist-in-charge. The board may maintain a register of pharmacy technicians as necessary to maintain public welfare.

The board is authorized to conduct hearings and issue orders concerning alleged violations of parts 2-5 of this chapter or rules promulgated pursuant to parts 2-5 of this chapter and shall retain jurisdiction over all of its orders to allow, when good cause is established, modification of those orders and the reinstatement or reactivation of any license or certificate that the board revoked or suspended pursuant to those orders.

The board is authorized to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction of any person who is practicing pharmacy in Tennessee without a valid license or who has violated any of the provisions of parts 2-5 of this chapter or the rules of the board to enjoin that person from continuing to practice within this state.

The director is granted authority to issue subpoenas for witnesses and records and to administer oaths to witnesses.

The board may join professional organizations and associations organized to promote the improvement of the standards of the practice of pharmacy for the protection of the health and welfare of the public.

The board may authorize, subject to the approval of the commissioner, administrative and investigative personnel and board members to attend local, state, regional and national meetings and to perform other necessary functions. These personnel shall be reimbursed for all travel and other necessary expenses, which shall be claimed and paid in accordance with the prevailing travel regulations of state government.

The board has the other duties, powers and authority necessary to enforce parts 2-5 of this chapter.

The board shall adopt rules establishing minimum standards and conditions for receiving, preparing, maintaining, transferring and dispensing of prescription orders.

The board of pharmacy shall regularly notify each holder of a pharmacy or a pharmacist license of changes that are to be implemented or enforced by the board that affect the licensee. These changes shall include newly promulgated or amended statutes, rules, policies or guidelines.

The board of pharmacy shall establish and maintain a link or links on the board of pharmacy website to the statutes, rules, policies and guidelines that are implemented or enforced by the board and affect the licensee.

The board of pharmacy shall mandate that the licensee maintain at the site of the licensee's practice a copy of the board of pharmacy statutes, rules, policies and guidelines.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 11; T.C.A. 63-10-504; Acts 2007, ch. 407, §§ 2, 10-14; 2008, ch. 1072, § 1; 2009, ch. 29, § 1.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-305. Power of board to suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue licenses — Civil penalties.

The board is authorized to deny, restrict or condition any application for licensure or certification and is authorized to revoke or suspend any license or certification previously issued or otherwise discipline and assess civil penalties against a applicant, licensee or holder of a certificate upon a finding that the applicant, licensee or holder of a certificate has:

Been convicted of a crime;

Been convicted of violating any of the laws of this state or of the United States relating to drugs or to the practice of pharmacy;

Been addicted to the use of alcohol, narcotics or other drugs;

Engaged in conduct prohibited or made unlawful by any of the provisions of parts 2-5 of this chapter or any other laws of the state or of the United States relating to drugs or to the practice of pharmacy;

Exhibited an incapacity of a nature that prevents a pharmacist from engaging in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, confidence and safety to the public;

Been guilty of dishonorable, immoral, unethical or unprofessional conduct;

Had the license to practice pharmacy suspended or revoked by another state for disciplinary reasons; or

Failed to comply with a lawful order or duly promulgated rule of the board.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 13; T.C.A. § 63-10-505; Acts 2007, ch. 407, §§ 2, 15, 16.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-306. License requirements.

Except as otherwise provided in parts 2-5 of this chapter, it is unlawful for any individual to engage in the practice of pharmacy unless currently licensed or otherwise authorized under parts 2-5 of this chapter to practice under any facet of the provisions of parts 2-5 of this chapter.

The board is authorized to establish the experience and education qualifications necessary for admission to the board's licensure or certification examination or examinations.

The board may utilize any national certification or licensure examination or contract any qualified examination agency to prepare and administer its licensure examination or examinations, and the board shall establish by rule the minimum score necessary to pass any licensure or certification examination or examinations required by the board.

An applicant for licensure as a pharmacist shall be at least twenty-one (21) years of age, be a graduate of a school or college of pharmacy recognized by the board, and submit an application for licensure on a form or forms approved by the board in writing or via online application and pursuant to board rules and regulations.

When satisfied that the qualifications of pharmacists licensed in other states are equivalent to or greater than requirements for licensure in this state, the board may grant licenses to reciprocal applicants from other states. The board may refuse to issue licenses to reciprocal applicants from other states on such grounds as the board may establish in its regulations.

The board has the authority to license and register pharmacists, pharmacies, wholesalers, distributors, pharmacy technicians, manufacturers, third-party logistics providers, and such other persons as the board may be required to license under federal or state law upon requirements established by the board's rules. This subsection (f) shall not be construed to include manufacturers' representatives, unless otherwise required by federal or state law.

The board shall have the authority to establish the criteria, timing and procedure for renewal of licenses and certifications.

The board is authorized to establish any and all necessary requirements for continuing education for those the board licenses or to whom the board issues certificates. This authority includes, but is not limited to, the establishment of the number of hours required, approval of providers and course content, enforcement and qualification for waiver of the requirements or extension of time in which to obtain the continuing education.

The board shall define by rule the scope of practice of a pharmacy technician and the qualifications necessary to practice as a pharmacy technician. The board may designate by rule which national or other qualified pharmacy technician certification agencies will be recognized in this state for purposes of holding the status of a certified pharmacy technician.

Any person licensed by the board of pharmacy under this section and holding a valid wholesaler license is considered to be licensed as a drug distributor until such a time when the board can promulgate rules to implement the third-party logistic provider (3PL) licensing process.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 14; T.C.A. § 63-10-506; Acts 2007, ch. 407, §§ 2, 17, 18; 2014, ch. 949, § 9; 2015, ch. 293, § 5; 2017, ch. 268, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (j).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 268, § 2. May 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 – 63-1-112.

Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-307. Inspection of sites — Physicians regulated by board of medical examiners.

The board or its designated agents have the power and authority to regulate the practice of pharmacy and to inspect any site or professional pharmacy practice, other than storage sites utilized by manufacturer's representatives, where drugs, medicines, chemicals, pharmaceuticals or poisons are manufactured, stored, sold, dispensed, distributed or administered.

Authority over drug dispensing in the office of a physician licensed to practice under chapter 6 of this title shall be vested in the board of medical examiners.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 15; T.C.A. § 63-10-507; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 19.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-308. Administrative fees.

The board is authorized to establish fees necessary to carry out parts 2-5 of this chapter pursuant to duly promulgated rules.

All monies received by the board shall be deposited and dispensed pursuant to § 63-1-137.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 16; T.C.A. § 63-10-508; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 20.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-309. Administrative procedure.

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, shall govern all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case as defined therein, arising under parts 2-5 of this chapter.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 17; T.C.A. § 63-10-509; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 2.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-310. Transfer of board of pharmacy to department of health.

For the purposes of transferring the board of pharmacy from the department of commerce and insurance to the department of health, the existing members of the board of pharmacy shall continue to serve as members of the Tennessee board of pharmacy until their terms expire. All rules and regulations of the state board of pharmacy shall remain in force and effect until modified, superseded or repealed by the board of pharmacy. All orders, decisions, licenses and certifications previously issued by the board of pharmacy or the department of commerce and insurance relating to or on behalf of the board of pharmacy shall remain in full force and effect and shall hereafter be administered and enforced by the department of health. To this end, the division of health related boards shall have the authority, consistent with the statutes and regulations pertaining to the programs and functions transferred in this section, to modify orders, decisions, licenses and certifications previously issued and to adopt and issue new orders as may be necessary for the administration of the programs or functions transferred in this section.

Acts 1996, ch. 651, § 18; T.C.A. § 63-10-510; Acts 2007, ch. 407, § 21.

Cross-References. Tennessee Pharmacy Practice Act of 1996, title 63, ch. 10, parts 2-5.

63-10-311. Promulgation of rules regarding oversight of facilities that manufacture, warehouse, and distribute medical devices.

The board shall promulgate rules regarding the board's oversight of facilities that manufacture, warehouse, and distribute medical devices. The rulemaking process shall begin no later than September 1, 2018. The rulemaking process shall be in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and shall include the formation of an advisory committee, in accordance with § 4-5-205, composed of medical device industry representatives and a representative of the department of economic and community development. The rules promulgated pursuant to this section shall be reviewed every three (3) years for the purpose of reviewing the advancements of new medical device technologies.

Acts 2018, ch. 1029, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1029, § 2. July 1, 2018.